Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Dentists

§§ 801,
802.
Repealed. 2011, No. 116 (Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 803.
Repealed.
1961, No. 172, § 5, eff. June 21, 1961.

§§ 804,
805.
Repealed. 2011, No. 116 (Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§§ 806,
807.
Repealed.
1977, No. 255 (Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§§ 808-812.
Repealed. 2011, No. 116 (Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 813.
Repealed. 1993, No. 108 (Adj. Sess.), § 21.